California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 163) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 75.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Section conditionally operative on January 1, 2025, or later, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15833.

(a) A person eligible pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 15832 shall not be eligible to participate in the program if, at the time of application, she is eligible for Medi-Cal without a share of cost or for Medicare.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 77.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15834.

A person shall not be eligible for covered services under the program if those services are covered through private health care coverage arrangements at the time of eligibility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 68.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

15835.

(a) Subscribers enrolled pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 15832 shall not be disenrolled for failure to pay subscriber contributions. The department may impose or contract for collection actions to collect unpaid subscriber contributions.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 78.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15836.

(a) If a subscriber is dissatisfied with any action, or failure to act, that has occurred in connection with eligibility or covered services under this chapter, the subscriber may appeal to the department and shall be accorded an opportunity for a fair hearing. Hearings may be conducted pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) The department may place a lien on compensation or benefits that are recovered or recoverable by a subscriber for whom benefits have been provided under a policy or plan issued under this chapter from any party or parties responsible for the compensation or benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 68.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

15838.

(a) A provider who is furnished documentation of a subscriber’s enrollment in the program shall not seek reimbursement or attempt to obtain payment for any covered services provided to that subscriber other than from the participating health plan or insurer covering the subscriber or from the department.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to any copayment required by the department under this chapter for the covered services provided to the subscriber.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, “provider” means any professional person, organization, health facility, or other person or institution licensed by the state to deliver or furnish
 health care services and includes as that term is defined in subdivision (o) of Section 14043.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 68.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

15839.

(a) Services that would be covered under the program that are provided to pregnant women who, after receiving those services, are subsequently determined to be eligible for coverage under this chapter may be reimbursed as determined by the department. In no case shall services received prior to 40 days before a woman’s date of application be eligible for reimbursement.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 79.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15840.

(a) (1) At a minimum, coverage provided pursuant to this chapter shall be provided to subscribers during one pregnancy, and until the end of the month in which the 60th day after pregnancy occurs, and to eligible children less than two years of age who were born of a pregnancy covered under this program or the Access for Infants and Mothers program under former Part 6.3 (commencing with Section 12695) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code to a woman enrolled in the Access for Infants and Mothers program.

(2) (A) Upon the effective date reflected in any necessary federal approvals obtained by the department pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14005.185, a subscriber described in paragraph (1) shall be eligible for an
 additional 10-month period following the 60-day postpartum period, for a total of 12 months of continuous eligibility after the end of pregnancy.

(B) This paragraph shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, any necessary federal approvals are obtained pursuant to Section 14005.185 and federal financial participation is available, and subject to an annual appropriation by the Legislature for this purpose.

(b) Coverage provided pursuant to this chapter shall include, at a minimum, those services required to be provided by health care service plans approved by the Secretary of Health and Human Services as a federally qualified health care service plan pursuant to Section 417.101 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) Medically necessary prescription drugs shall be a required benefit in the
 coverage provided pursuant to this chapter.

(d) To the extent required pursuant to Section 15818 to comply with paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 30122 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, health education services related to tobacco use shall be a benefit in the coverage provided under this chapter.

(e) (1) If the voters approve the addition of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 14199.100) to Part 3 of this division at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election, and the conditions described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 15832, as added by Section 137 of the act that added this subdivision, have been met, this section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2025, or the date certified by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 15832, as added by Section 137 of the act that added this subdivision,
 whichever is later, and shall be repealed on January 1 directly following that date.

(2) If the voters do not approve the addition of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 14199.100) to Part 3 of this division at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election, and the conditions described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 15832, as added by Section 137 of the act that added this subdivision, have been met, this section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2026, or the date certified by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 15832, as added by Section 137 of the act that added this subdivision, whichever is later, and shall be repealed on January 1 directly following that date.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 138) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 77.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Conditionally inoperative on or after January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.   Repealed January 1 following the inoperative date.    See later operative version as amended by Sec. 78 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

15840.

(a) (1) At a minimum, coverage provided pursuant to this chapter shall be provided to subscribers during one pregnancy, and until the end of the month in which the 60th day after pregnancy occurs, and to eligible children less than two years of age, or less than five years of age pursuant to Section 15832, who were born of a pregnancy covered under this program or the Access for Infants and Mothers program under former Part 6.3 (commencing with Section 12695) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code to a person enrolled in the Access for Infants and Mothers program.

(2) (A) Upon the effective date reflected in any necessary federal approvals obtained by the department pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14005.185, a
 subscriber described in paragraph (1) shall be eligible for an additional 10-month period following the 60-day postpartum period, for a total of 12 months of continuous eligibility after the end of pregnancy.

(B) This paragraph shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, any necessary federal approvals are obtained pursuant to Section 14005.185 and federal financial participation is available, and subject to an annual appropriation by the Legislature for this purpose.

(b) Coverage provided pursuant to this chapter shall include, at a minimum, those services required to be provided by health care service plans approved by the Secretary of Health and Human Services as a federally qualified health care service plan pursuant to Section 417.101 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) Medically
 necessary prescription drugs shall be a required benefit in the coverage provided pursuant to this chapter.

(d) To the extent required pursuant to Section 15818 to comply with paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 30122 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, health education services related to tobacco use shall be a benefit in the coverage provided under this chapter.

(e) (1) If the voters approve the addition of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 14199.100) to Part 3 of this division at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election, this section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, or the date certified by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 15832, as added by Section 137 of the act that added this subdivision, whichever is later, and shall be repealed on January 1 directly following that date.

(2) If the voters do not approve the addition of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 14199.100) to Part 3 of this division at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election, this section shall become operative on January 1, 2026, or the date certified by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 15832, as added by Section 137 of the act that added this subdivision, whichever is later, and shall be repealed on January 1 directly following that date.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 137) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 78.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Section conditionally operative on January 1, 2025, or later, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Conditionally repealed on January 1 directly following that date, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15841.

(a) Through its courts, statutes, and under its Constitution, California protects a woman’s right to reproductive privacy. California reaffirms these protections and specifically its Supreme Court decision in People v. Belous (1969) 71 Cal.2d 954, 966-68.

(b) The State Department of Health Care Services may accept or use moneys under Title XXI of the Social Security Act (known as the Children’s Health Insurance Program or CHIP), as interpreted in Section 457.10 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, to fund services for women pursuant to Section 14007.7 and this chapter only when, during the period of coverage, the woman is the beneficiary. The scope of services covered under Medi-Cal and this
 chapter, as defined in statutes, regulations, and state plans, is not altered by this section or the state plan amendment submitted pursuant to this section.

(c) California’s CHIP plan and any amendments submitted and implemented pursuant to this section shall be consistent with subdivisions (a) and (b).

(d) This section is a declaration of existing law.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 82.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15842.

Notwithstanding any other law, for a subscriber who is determined by the California Children’s Services Program to be eligible for benefits under the program pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 123800) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code, a provider shall not be responsible for the provision of, or payment for, the particular services authorized by the California Children’s Services Program for the particular subscriber for the treatment of a California Children’s Services Program eligible medical condition. Providers shall refer a child whom they reasonably suspect of having a medical condition that is eligible for services under the California Children’s Services Program to the California Children’s Services Program. The California
 Children’s Services Program shall provide case management and authorization of services if the child is found to be medically eligible for the California Children’s Services Program. Diagnosis and treatment services that are authorized by the California Children’s Services Program shall be performed by paneled providers for that program and approved special care centers of that program in accordance with treatment plans approved by the California Children’s Services Program. All other services provided under this chapter shall be available to the subscriber.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 68.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

15844.

A child enrolled in the program under this chapter who has a medical condition that is eligible for services pursuant to the California Children’s Services Program, and whose family is not financially eligible for the California Children’s Services Program, shall have the medically necessary treatment services for his or her California Children’s Services Program eligible medical condition authorized and paid for by the California Children’s Services Program. County expenditures for the payment of services for the child shall be waived and these expenditures shall be paid for by the state from Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa et seq.) funds and state general funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 68.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

15846.

The department shall encourage all providers who provide services under the program to have viable protocols for screening and referring children needing supplemental services outside of the scope of the screening, preventive, and medically necessary and therapeutic services covered by the contract to public programs providing such supplemental services for which they may be eligible, as well as for coordination of care between the provider and the public programs. The public programs for which providers may be required to develop screening, referral, and care coordination protocols may include the California Children’s Services Program, the regional centers, county mental health programs, programs administered by the Department of Alcohol and Drug Programs or its successor agency or
 agencies, and programs administered by local education agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 68.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

15847.

(a) It shall constitute unfair competition for purposes of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code for an insurer, an insurance agent or broker, or an administrator, as defined in Section 1759 of the Insurance Code, to refer an individual employee or employee’s dependent to the program, or arrange for an individual employee or employee’s dependent to apply to the program, for the purpose of separating that employee or employee’s dependent from group health coverage provided in connection with the employee’s employment.

(b) Any employee described in subdivision (a) shall have a personal right of action to enforce subdivision (a).

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 83.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15847.3.

(a) It shall constitute an unfair labor practice contrary to public policy, and enforceable under Section 95 of the Labor Code, for any employer to refer an individual employee or employee’s dependent to the program, or to arrange for an individual employee or employee’s dependent to apply to the program, for the purpose of separating that employee or employee’s dependent from group health coverage provided in connection with the employee’s employment.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 84.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15847.5.

(a) It shall constitute an unfair labor practice contrary to public policy and enforceable under Section 95 of the Labor Code for any employer to change the employee-employer share-of-cost ratio or to make any other modification of maternity care coverage for employees or employees’ dependents that results in the enrollment of the employees or employees’ dependents in the program established pursuant to this chapter.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 85.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15847.7.

(a) For purposes of Sections 15847, 15847.3, and 15847.5, “group health coverage” includes any health care service plan, self-insured employee welfare benefit plan, or disability insurance providing medical or hospital benefits.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 62.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

15848.

(a) The Perinatal Insurance Fund is continued in existence in the State Treasury under the administration of the department.

(b) Amounts deposited in the fund shall only be used for the purposes specified by this chapter.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the fund is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the department, for the purposes specified in this chapter.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 87.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15848.5.

(a) The department shall authorize the expenditure of money in the fund to cover program expenses, including program expenses that exceed subscriber contributions.

(b) From money appropriated by the Legislature to the fund, the department may expend sufficient funds for operating expenses incurred in carrying out this chapter.

(c) The department shall develop and utilize all appropriate cost containment measures to maximize the coverage offered under the program.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 88.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15849.

(a) Effective July 1, 2022, to the extent allowable under federal law, notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter to the contrary, the department may elect not to impose subscriber contributions for purposes of coverage as described in this chapter, including, but not limited to, subscriber contributions for Access-linked infants, for an applicable coverage period.

(b) If the department elects to not impose subscriber contributions for an applicable coverage period pursuant to subdivision (a) or elects to reinstate such subscriber contributions for a subsequent coverage period, the department shall specify that election in the published Medi-Cal Local Assistance Estimate for the impacted state fiscal year or years, subject to appropriation by
 the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 140.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. County Children’s Health Initiative Program [15850. - 15864.]

15850.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the County Children’s Health Initiative Program (CCHIP).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 266, Sec. 9.   (AB 614)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

15850.1.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Administrative costs” means those expenses that are described in Section 1397ee(a)(1)(D) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(b) “Applicant” means a county, county agency, a local initiative, or a county organized health system.

(c) “Department” means the State Department of Health Care Services.

(d) “Child” means a person under 19 years of age.

(e) “Comprehensive health insurance
 coverage” means the coverage provided in Section 2103 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397cc) and shall be equivalent to the coverage provided to state employees through the Public Employees’ Retirement System for the most recent plan year preceding the applicable program plan year, except that the plans may provide a mechanism for inpatient hospital care provided under the mental health benefit through which applicants may agree to a treatment plan in which each inpatient day may be substituted for two residential treatment days or three day treatment program days.

(f) “County Children’s Health Initiative Program” or “CCHIP” means the program established pursuant to this chapter.

(g) “County organized health system” means a health system implemented pursuant to
 Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5) of Chapter 7 of Part 3 of this division and Article 1 (commencing with Section 101675) of Chapter 3 of Part 4 of Division 101 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) “Fund” means the County Health Initiative Matching Fund.

(i) “Local initiative” means a prepaid health plan that is organized by, or designated by, a county government or county governments, or organized by stakeholders, of a region designated by the department to provide comprehensive health care to eligible Medi-Cal beneficiaries. The entities established pursuant to Sections 14018.7, 14087.31, 14087.35, 14087.36, 14087.38, and 14087.96 are local initiatives.

(j) “Optional targeted low-income children group” means
 the population described in Section 1905(u)(2)(B) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396d(u)(2)(B)) and in Section 14005.26.

(k) “Access program” means the Medi-Cal Access Program under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15810).

(l) “Health care service plan” includes Medi-Cal managed care plans contracting with the department under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 266, Sec. 10.   (AB 614)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

15850.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, except as provided in subdivision (b), each applicant who was participating in CCHIP, formerly known as the County Health Initiative Matching Fund, on March 23, 2010, pursuant to former Part 6.4 (commencing with Section 12699.50) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, shall participate in the program established by this chapter, maintaining eligibility standards, methodologies, and procedures at least as favorable to eligible individuals as those in effect on March 23, 2010, and in a manner that satisfies the maintenance of effort obligation established in Section 2105(d)(3) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397ee(d)(3)).

(b) (1) If an applicant county participating in CCHIP, formerly known as the County Health Initiative Matching Fund, on March 23, 2010, elects to cease funding the nonfederal share of program expenditures made pursuant to Section 15852, the department shall administer the program within that applicant county consistent with subdivision (a).

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the state general fund shall provide funding amounts equal to the total nonfederal share of all expenditures incurred by the department pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) The nonfederal share amounts described in paragraph (2) shall be deposited in the County Health Initiative Matching Fund created pursuant to Section 15852, and those funds shall be used by the department for purposes otherwise
 consistent with that section.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, as of the enactment of this section, the department shall not approve any additional applicant for participation under this chapter other than those applicants participating as of March 23, 2010.

(d) This section shall only be operative to extent that federal financial participation is not jeopardized and any necessary federal approvals are secured.

(e) This section shall become inoperative on the date that the maintenance of effort obligation pursuant to Section 2105(d)(3) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397ee(d)(3)) is no longer applicable to the state for purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 266, Sec. 11.   (AB 614)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Inoperative on date prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15852.

(a) The County Health Initiative Matching Fund is hereby continued in existence within the State Treasury. The fund shall accept funding, including but not limited to, funding from intergovernmental transfers as follows:

(1) The nonfederal matching fund requirement for federal financial participation through the State Children’s Health Insurance Program (Subchapter 21 (commencing with Section 1397aa) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code).

(2) Funding associated with a proposal approved pursuant to subdivision (e) Section 15853.

(3) State general fund amounts
 pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 15850.5.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, amounts deposited in the fund shall be continuously appropriated to the department without regard to fiscal year, and shall be used only for the purposes specified by this section.

(c) The department shall administer this fund and the provisions of this chapter for the express purpose of allowing local or state funds to be used to facilitate increasing the state’s ability to utilize federal funds available to California and for costs associated with a proposal pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 15853 or for costs incurred by the department pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 15850.5. Federal funds shall be used prior to the expiration of their authority for programs designed to improve and expand access for uninsured persons.

(d) The department shall be reimbursed from the fund to cover the cost to administer the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 89.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15864.)
-------------------------------------------

15853.

(a) (1) An applicant that will provide an intergovernmental transfer may submit a proposal to the department for funding for the purpose of providing comprehensive health insurance coverage to any child who meets citizenship and immigration status requirements that are applicable to persons participating in the program established by Title XXI of the Social Security Act, and whose family income is at or below 317 percent of the federal poverty level or, at the option of the applicant, at or below 411 percent of the federal poverty level, in specific geographic areas, as published quarterly in the Federal Register by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, as determined, counted and valued in accordance with the requirements of Section 1396a(e)(14) of Title 42 of the United States Code, as
 added by the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148) and as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152) and any subsequent amendments, and which child meets both of the following requirements:

(A) Does not qualify for the optional targeted low-income children group or the Access program.

(B) Does not qualify for Medi-Cal with no share of cost pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3.

(2) In its application, the applicant shall specify the income level at or below 411 percent of the federal poverty level for which it will provide coverage.

(3) The intergovernmental transfer amount is limited to the expenditures which would be eligible for federal
 financial participation.

(b) The proposal shall guarantee at least one year of intergovernmental transfer funding by the applicant at a level that ensures compliance with the requirements of any applicable approved federal waiver or state plan amendment as well as the department’s requirements for the sound operation of the proposed project, and shall, on an annual basis, either commit to fully funding the necessary intergovernmental amount or withdraw from the program. The department may identify specific geographical areas that, compared to the national level, have a higher cost of living or housing or a greater need for additional health services, using data obtained from the most recent federal census, the federal Consumer Expenditure Survey, or from other sources. The proposal may include an administrative mechanism for outreach and eligibility.

(c) The applicant may include
 in its proposal reimbursement of medical, dental, vision, or mental health services delivered to children who are eligible under the Access program or under the Medi-Cal program as an optional targeted low-income children group beneficiary, if these services are part of an overall program with the measurable goal of enrolling served children in the Access program or the optional targeted low-income children group.

(d) If a child is determined to be eligible for benefits for the treatment of an eligible medical condition under the California Children’s Services Program pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 123800) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code, the health, dental, or vision plan providing services to the child pursuant to this chapter shall not be responsible for the provision of, or payment for, those authorized services for that child. The proposal from an applicant shall contain provisions to
 ensure that a child whom the health, dental, or vision plan reasonably believes would be eligible for services under the California Children’s Services Program is referred to that program. The California Children’s Services Program shall provide case management and authorization of services if the child is found to be eligible for the California Children’s Services Program. Diagnosis and treatment services that are authorized by the California Children’s Services Program shall be performed by paneled providers for that program and approved special care centers of that program and approved by the California Children’s Services Program. All other services provided under the proposal from the applicant shall be made available pursuant to this chapter to a child who is eligible for services under the California Children’s Services Program.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an applicant may submit a proposal to the department
 for the purposes of providing comprehensive health insurance coverage to children whose coverage is not eligible for funding under Title XXI of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa, et seq.), or to a combination of children whose coverage is eligible for funding under Title XXI of the Social Security Act and children whose coverage is not eligible for that funding. To be approved by the department, these proposals shall comply with both of the following requirements:

(1) Meet all applicable requirements for funding under this chapter, except for availability of funding through Title XXI of the Social Security Act.

(2) Provide for the administration of children’s coverage by the department through the administrative infrastructure serving the Medi-Cal program, and through health care service plans serving the Medi-Cal program.

(f) Implementation of this section is conditioned on the department obtaining necessary federal approval of these provisions.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, the status of any application previously submitted to, and approved by, the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board pursuant to former Part 6.4 (commencing with Section 12699.50) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code shall not be altered as a result of the assumption by the department, pursuant to this chapter, of the responsibilities previously exercised by the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board.

(h) (1) If the voters approve the addition of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 14199.100) to Part 3 of this division at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election, and the conditions described in paragraph (1) of subdivision
 (k) of Section 15853, as added by Section 21 of the act that added this subdivision, have been met, this section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2025, or the date certified by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (k) of Section 15853, as added by Section 21 of the act that added this subdivision, whichever is later, and shall be repealed on January 1 directly following that date.

(2) If the voters do not approve the addition of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 14199.100) to Part 3 of this division at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election, and the conditions described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (k) of Section 15853, as added by Section 21 of the act that added this subdivision, have been met, this section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2026, or the date certified by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (k) of Section 15853, as added by Section 21 of the act that added this
 subdivision, whichever is later, and shall be repealed on January 1 directly following that date.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 738, Sec. 20) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 79.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Conditionally inoperative on or after January 1, 2025, as prescribed by its own provisions.    Conditionally repealed January 1 following the inoperative date.   See later operative version as amended by Sec. 80 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

15853.

(a) (1) An applicant that will provide an intergovernmental transfer may submit a proposal to the department for funding for the purpose of providing comprehensive health insurance coverage to any child who meets citizenship and immigration status requirements that are applicable to persons participating in the program established by Title XXI of the Social Security Act, and whose family income is at or below 317 percent of the federal poverty level or, at the option of the applicant, at or below 411 percent of the federal poverty level, in specific geographic areas, as published quarterly in the Federal Register by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, as determined, counted, and valued in accordance with the requirements of Section 1396a(e)(14) of Title 42 of the United States Code, as
 added by the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148) and as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152) and any subsequent amendments, and which child meets both of the following requirements:

(A) Does not qualify for the optional targeted low-income children group or the Access program.

(B) Does not qualify for Medi-Cal with no share of cost pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3.

(2) In its application, the applicant shall specify the income level at or below 411 percent of the federal poverty level for which it will provide coverage.

(3) The intergovernmental transfer amount is limited to the expenditures which would be eligible for federal
 financial participation.

(b) The proposal shall guarantee at least one year of intergovernmental transfer funding by the applicant at a level that ensures compliance with the requirements of any applicable approved federal waiver or state plan amendment as well as the department’s requirements for the sound operation of the proposed project, and shall, on an annual basis, either commit to fully funding the necessary intergovernmental amount or withdraw from the program. The department may identify specific geographical areas that, compared to the national level, have a higher cost of living or housing or a greater need for additional health services, using data obtained from the most recent federal census, the federal Consumer Expenditure Survey, or from other sources. The proposal may include an administrative mechanism for outreach and eligibility.

(c) The applicant may include
 in its proposal reimbursement of medical, dental, vision, or mental health services delivered to children who are eligible under the Access program or under the Medi-Cal program as an optional targeted low-income children group beneficiary, if these services are part of an overall program with the measurable goal of enrolling served children in the Access program or the optional targeted low-income children group.

(d) If a child is determined to be eligible for benefits for the treatment of an eligible medical condition under the California Children’s Services Program pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 123800) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code, the health, dental, or vision plan providing services to the child pursuant to this chapter shall not be responsible for the provision of, or payment for, those authorized services for that child. The proposal from an applicant shall contain provisions to
 ensure that a child whom the health, dental, or vision plan reasonably believes would be eligible for services under the California Children’s Services Program is referred to that program. The California Children’s Services Program shall provide case management and authorization of services if the child is found to be eligible for the California Children’s Services Program. Diagnosis and treatment services that are authorized by the California Children’s Services Program shall be performed by paneled providers for that program and approved special care centers of that program and approved by the California Children’s Services Program. All other services provided under the proposal from the applicant shall be made available pursuant to this chapter to a child who is eligible for services under the California Children’s Services Program.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an applicant may submit a proposal to the department